Arkansas, session 2025, SB59.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-722, concerning free and reduced-price
meals, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
*TNL092*
02-12-2025 10:08:59 TNL092

As Engrossed: S1/30/25 S2/4/25 H2/12/25 SB59
(f)(1) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year and each school year
thereafter, a public school student who is not a qualifying student under
this section and does not receive a free breakfast through any local, state,
or federal program shall be provided one (1) breakfast at no cost during each
school day upon his or her request without consideration of his or her
eligibility for a federally funded free or reduced-price meal.
(2)(A) If necessary to comply with the requirements of
subdivision (f)(1) of this section, the department shall provide funds that
have been disbursed to the department from the United States Government for
purposes of funding child nutrition programs to each public school to cover
the cost of providing one (1) breakfast at no cost during each school day to
each public school student who is not a qualifying student under this
section.
(B) If federal funds appropriated to the department for a
child nutrition program are insufficient to cover the cost of providing one
(1) breakfast at no cost during each school day to each public school student
who is not a qualifying student, the department shall use funds as authorized
by law to cover the cost of providing one (1) breakfast at no cost during
each school day to each public school student who is not a qualifying
student.
(C) The cost of providing one (1) breakfast shall not
exceed the rate of reimbursement to public schools established by the
National School Lunch Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1751 et seq., and the Child Nutrition
Act of 1966, 42 U.S.C. § 1771 et seq., for a free school breakfast.
(g) The department may promulgate rules to implement this section."

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 19-5-202(b)(2)(B)(v), concerning
distributions from the net general revenue in the General Revenue Fund
Account, is amended to read as follows:
(v)(a) Next, the Secretary of the Department of
Finance and Administration shall certify the amount distributed to the
General Revenue Fund Account from the sales tax and the special privilege tax
on medical marijuana under § 17(c) of the Arkansas Medical Marijuana
Amendment of 2016, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98, for the month.
(b) The Treasurer of State shall then deduct
an amount equal to the amount certified under subdivision (b)(2)(B)(v)(a) of
02-12-2025 10:08:59 TNL092

As Engrossed: S1/30/25 S2/4/25 H2/12/25 SB59
this section from the General Revenue Fund Account and transfer the amount to
the Restricted Reserve Fund to be used to address food insecurity and health
needs Food Insecurity Fund; and

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 5, Subchapter 12, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
19-5-1287. Food Insecurity Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Food Insecurity Fund”.
(b) The Food Insecurity Fund shall consist of:
(1) General Revenues authorized by law;
(2) Funds transferred from the General Revenue Fund Account as
set out in § 19-5-202;
(3) Moneys obtained from private grants or other sources that
are designated to be credited to the Food Insecurity Fund; and
(4) Any other funds authorized or provided by law.
(c)(1) By July 31 each fiscal year:
(A) The Department of Education shall submit a
certification to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State of the amount expensed
by the Department of Education the prior fiscal year to comply with § 6-18-
722(b) to eliminate a charge to students for a reduced-price copayment for a
school breakfast or a school lunch, which shall be reviewed by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State; and
(B) The Department of Human Services shall submit a
certification to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State of the estimated
amount required to fund the state matching funds requirement for the federal
Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer Program for Children, commonly known as
"Summer EBT", for the current fiscal year, which shall be reviewed by the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(2) After reviewing the certifications submitted under
subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may
deny, modify, or approve the certifications based on the:
(A) Estimated amount of funding needed and available;
(B) Purpose; and
(C) Preferred spending priority.
02-12-2025 10:08:59 TNL092

As Engrossed: S1/30/25 S2/4/25 H2/12/25 SB59
(3) Based on the certifications from the Department of Education
and the Department of Human Services in subdivision (c)(1) of this section,
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall instruct the Treasurer of State
to transfer those amounts on a pro rata basis to the fund or fund accounts
designated by the Secretary of the Department of Education and the Secretary
of the Department of Human Services.
(d) Any unexpended balance of moneys in the fund accounts designated
by the Department of Education and the Department of Human Services to be
allocated for the purposes under subsection (c) of this section that are
remaining at the end of each fiscal year shall be designated and retained for
the purposes under subsection (c) of this section for the following fiscal
year, and certifications required under subdivision (c)(1) of this section
shall be adjusted to reflect the remaining balances.
(e) After making the transfers under subdivision (c)(3) of this
section, the Treasurer of State shall then transfer the remainder of the
balance of the Food Insecurity Fund to the fund account designated by the
Department of Education to be used by the Department of Education to comply
with § 6-18-722(f).
(f) Any unexpended balance of moneys in the fund account designated by
the Department of Education allocated for the purposes under subdivision (e)
of this section that are remaining at the end of each fiscal year shall be
designated and retained for the purposes outlined under subdivision (e) of
this section for the following fiscal year.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. Funding transfer.
On June 30, 2025, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall transfer
on his or her books and those of the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of
the State the fund balance remaining in the Food Insecurity and Health Needs
Set-Aside of the Restricted Reserve Fund to the Food Insecurity Fund.

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that for planning purposes, public
school districts need to know what the legal expectations are with respect to
student meals; that before the upcoming school year and fiscal year, it is
necessary to capture the correct funding in order to fund this act; and that
this act is immediately necessary to give the Department of Finance and
02-12-2025 10:08:59 TNL092

As Engrossed: S1/30/25 S2/4/25 H2/12/25 SB59
Administration, the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, and the
Department of Human Services ample time to implement this act and create the
funds required by this act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and
this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public
peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/J. Dismang























02-12-2025 10:08:59 TNL092